California statutes. Public Utilities Code
“Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of principal or interest of this bond.”
(5) The department is authorized to enter into any lease, easement, permit, or other agreement with the commission necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(6) The commission shall have the authority to impose tolls for use of the transportation facilities for 50 years following the opening of the transportation facilities for public use, after which time the commission shall have no further authority to impose or to collect a toll for use of transportation facilities on State Highway Route 91, unless reauthorized by the Legislature. The transportation facilities shall revert to the department after the bonds issued pursuant to this section are paid off in their entirety, unless tolls have been reauthorized by the Legislature. Upon reversion, the facilities shall be delivered to the department in a condition that meets the performance and maintenance standards established by the department.

(7) The commission shall make available for public review and comment the toll schedule and any subsequent proposed changes to the schedule no less than 30 days prior to the adoption by the commission of a toll schedule.

(d) This section shall be supplemental and in addition to any other authority of the commission to undertake the transportation project.

(e) This section shall not prevent the department or any local agency from constructing facilities within the State Highway Route 91 corridor that compete with the transportation project, and in no event shall the commission be entitled to compensation for the adverse effects on toll revenues due to those facilities.

(f) If any provision of this section or the application thereof is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this extent the provisions of this section are severable.

(g) This section shall not apply to State Highway Route 91 between the Orange and Riverside County line and State Highway Route 15 unless the authority amends or partially assigns the restated franchise agreement, as amended, between the department and the authority to exclude that portion of State Highway Route 91 from the restated franchise agreement, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 714, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

130245.

(a) An advisory committee shall be created to review issues and make recommendations to the Orange County Transportation Authority and the Riverside County Transportation Commission regarding the facilities authorized pursuant to Sections 130240 and 130244, including tolls imposed, operations, maintenance, interoperability, and use of toll revenues, and improvements in the State Highway Route 91 corridor, including the identification and siting of alternative highways. The committee shall consist of 10 voting members and three nonvoting members, as follows:

(1) Five members of the Board of Directors of the Orange County Transportation Authority appointed by that board.

(2) Five members of the Riverside County Transportation Commission appointed by that commission.

(3) One member of the San Bernardino Associated Governments appointed by that body, and the district directors of Districts 8 and 12 of the Department of Transportation, all of whom shall be nonvoting members.

(b) The advisory committee shall establish rules for the conduct of committee meetings, which rules shall be approved by both the Orange County Transportation Authority and the Riverside County Transportation Commission. The authority and the commission may appoint alternates to the committee.

(c) When reviewing the initial toll structure proposed by the Orange County Transportation Authority and the Riverside County Transportation Commission or any changes to the toll structure, the advisory committee shall place an information item on a regularly scheduled agenda for public comment and consideration of the advisory committee.

(d) The Orange County Transportation Authority shall conduct an audit on an annual basis of the toll revenues collected and expenditures made during its operation of the facilities authorized in Section 130240. The audit shall review revenues and expenditures related to those facilities for consistency with that section and shall be provided to the advisory committee.

(e) The Riverside County Transportation Commission shall conduct an audit on an annual basis of the toll revenues collected and expenditures made during its operation of the facilities authorized in Section 130244. The audit shall review revenues and expenditures related to those facilities for consistency with that section and shall be provided to the advisory committee.

(f) The Orange County Transportation Authority and the Riverside County Transportation Commission shall equally share all costs associated with this section. None of these costs shall be paid from state funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 714, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

130246.

The Riverside County Transportation Commission may enter into contracts with private vendors for the performance of the following services:

(a) Enforcement of parking regulations adopted by the commission. Parking enforcement shall be performed in the manner provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Removal of vehicles parked in violation of a parking regulation adopted by the commission. Removal of vehicles shall be performed in the manner provided in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22650) of Division 11 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 512, Sec. 1.   (AB 1943)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Transportation Systems [130250. - 130263.]

130250.

The commission shall coordinate the operation of all public transportation services within the county so as to achieve efficient operation thereof and shall resolve all jurisdictional disputes between public transit operators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130251.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, if, at the time the commission commences operation, an application to the federal government has been submitted, or substantial progress has been made in preparation of such an application, for funds to start the necessary work toward the construction of a transit guideway project, the commission shall give top priority to supporting such an effort so that the flow of federal funds shall not be impeded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130252.

(a) All plans proposed for the design, construction, and implementation of public mass transit systems or projects, including exclusive public mass transit guideway systems or projects, and federal-aid and state highway projects, shall be submitted to the commission for approval. No such plan shall be approved unless it conforms to the appropriate adopted regional transportation plan pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 65080) of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(b) The commission shall have no approval authority over the projects, plans, and programs
 determined by the Department of Transportation to be necessary for the safety and maintenance of the state highway system. Such projects, plans, and programs shall be developed by the department and, to the extent feasible, be coordinated with the planning of the commission. Plans and programs involving significant rebuilding or rehabilitation of the state highway system, as determined by the department and the commission, shall be developed jointly by the department and the commission.

(c) As used in this section, “plan” means a project description and not the detailed project plans, specifications, and estimates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1106, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

130253.

Any plan for a transit system proposed to serve more than one county shall also be submitted for approval by the multicounty designated transportation planning agency. Action regarding such approval shall be taken within 60 working days after such a plan is submitted by the commission to the multicounty designated transportation planning agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130254.

The commission shall designate the operator of any approved transit guideway system.

Except as specified in Section 130254.5, the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission shall designate the Southern California Rapid Transit District as the transit guideway operator in Los Angeles County.

The Orange County Transportation Commission shall designate the Orange County Transit District as the transit guideway operator in Orange County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 950.)
-------------------------------------------

130254.5.

The City of Los Angeles may design, construct, and operate a point-to-point transportation system on or between property under the jurisdiction and control of its Department of Airports.

Once constructed and in operation, any such transportation system shall be coordinated with motor vehicle traffic operation and transit services by the county transportation commission having jurisdiction in the county in which the transportation system is located.

With the prior approval of the county transportation commission having such jurisdiction, the City of Los Angeles may submit applications for
 federal highway or transit funds or state highway or transit funds to construct or operate a point-to-point transportation system on or between property under the jurisdiction and control of its Department of Airports. This requirement shall not apply to any grant of such funds awarded prior to January 1, 1978.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 950.)
-------------------------------------------

130255.

(a) If a commuter or urban rail transit system is proposed to serve two or more counties, the commissions in those counties shall form a joint powers entity to conduct plan refinement studies, design, select the technology, determine the cost, locate the routes and access points, and supervise the construction, operation, and management of the system.

(b) The joint powers entity shall designate the operator of the system.

(c) If state funds are to be used for the operation of the system, at least four
 months prior to implementing service on the system, the joint powers entity shall submit its plan for the operation to the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1449, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130256.

The commission shall require all planning for guideway and rapid transit systems be coordinated with the Department of Transportation and the multicounty designated transportation planning agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130257.

The commission may enter into an agreement with the Department of Transportation for the department to provide those services which are within the capabilities of the department to effectively perform in connection with the development and construction of any approved exclusive public mass transit guideway system or rapid transit system.

The commission shall retain final authority to decide those matters for which it is responsible by law pertaining to the planning, design, construction, and operation of any exclusive public mass transit guideway system or rapid transit system.

The department
 shall perform such services agreed upon in accordance with the law and regulations that are applicable to the commission and the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130258.

If the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission is authorized to construct a transit guideway system, the commission shall closely coordinate the planning, design, and construction of the system with the Southern California Rapid Transit District, which shall serve as the designated operator of the system pursuant to Section 130254.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

130259.

(a) Not later than February 1, 1978, the commissions in Riverside County and San Bernardino County shall, and the commissions in Los Angeles County and Orange County may, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, the multicounty designated transportation planning agency, public transit operators, the county, and the cities involved, establish local transportation zones and adopt guidelines for their establishment and operation.

(b) It is particularly important that the county, cities, and other local public entities be involved in establishing local transportation zones.

(c) In adopting the guidelines, the commission shall take into account, among other things, the geographical shape of proposed local transportation zones, economies of scale of transit systems, and established and projected subregional patterns of travel.

(d) The guidelines shall provide for a method of governing each local transportation zone; shall provide for the establishment of multicounty local transportation zones; and shall authorize each board, under specified conditions, to provide transit services itself, through joint powers agreement or any other cooperative arrangement, or by contract with a public transit operator or a private common carrier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130260.

The Orange County Transportation Commission may establish local transportation zones only in those areas where the commission determines that the Orange County Transit District cannot otherwise provide adequate and responsive local transportation services in a cost-effective manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130261.

The Los Angeles County Transportation Commission may establish local transportation zones only in those areas where the commission determines by eight affirmative votes of the voting members, or designated alternates, that the Southern California Rapid Transit District or the included municipal operator cannot otherwise provide adequate and responsive local transportation services in a cost-effective manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

130262.

The commission shall require full cooperation and coordination between the regional operator, the municipal operators, and the local transportation zones in such matters as schedules, routes, and exchange of transfers.

The commission shall ensure that regional operators, the municipal operators, and local transportation zones do not compete or unnecessarily duplicate services, but assist each other to provide the maximum level of transit service to the general public at the lowest possible cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130263.

The Los Angeles County Transportation Commission shall not reduce, by order or by reducing funding, the size of the service areas under the jurisdiction of presently existing included municipal operators (as defined in Section 99207), the level of services they provide, or the scope of their operations, without first consulting with the municipal operators and securing the approval of the municipalities within which they operate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Smart Freeway Corridor Telecommunications Demonstration Projects [130290. - 130292.]

130290.

As used in this article:

(a) “Smart freeway corridor” means a segment of a state highway route in an urban area selected for a smart freeway demonstration project. 

(b) “Project” means a demonstration project which applies telecommunications and computer systems to reduce congestion and improve the flow of traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 960, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130291.

A smart freeway demonstration project shall be comprised of the following elements:

(a) A linked traffic monitoring network of traffic monitoring devices placed in freeway lanes, surface street travel lanes, turn lanes, and on ramps within the freeway corridor to continuously monitor traffic speeds and volumes to identify congestion and traffic incidents. 

(b) An interactive signal control system to allow central control personnel or systems to override regular signal cycles in order to expedite traffic flow of congested freeways and surface street intersections and to facilitate the diversion of traffic around congested areas. 

(c) A traffic information management system providing commuter access to current traffic information through telephones, radio and television, home computers, terminals in office buildings, in-vehicle motorist information systems, computer-activated changeable message signs placed on freeways, at on ramps, at parking garages, and on major arterials within the freeway corridor. 

(d) An improved emergency response system to accelerate the dispatch of emergency vehicles, traffic control officers, and signal maintenance crews, thus reducing the time needed to clear an incident causing traffic congestion. 

(e) Tow service to reduce traffic congestion caused by delays in removing stalled or damaged vehicles from the freeway in accordance with plans developed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol in consultation with the Department of Transportation. 

(f) A joint-agency data base system to coordinate construction and maintenance which impact traffic flow in the freeway corridor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 960, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130292.

(a) The project shall be coordinated by the statutorily created county transportation commission in whose jurisdiction the project is located. The county transportation commission shall consult with local traffic and law enforcement agencies, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol on all aspects of the project in order to provide necessary coordination of the project with existing plans and programs. 

(b) The county transportation commission shall make preliminary and final results of the demonstration project available to state and local public agencies for possible application throughout the state.

(c) The county transportation commission shall prepare and transmit to the Legislature, no later than one year after the completion of the project, a report of its findings, conclusions, and recommendations.

(d) The Department of Transportation shall reimburse the county transportation commission, from funds appropriated for projects pursuant to this article, for the costs incurred by the commission under this article.

(e) No money from the General Fund shall be used for the operation of a smart freeway corridor telecommunications project established as a demonstration project pursuant to this article after the demonstration project is completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 200.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transportation Planning and Programming [130300. - 130306.]

130300.

The Legislature finds and declares:

(a) That the near-term programming and budgeting requirements of state and federal law is a cooperative intergovernmental planning process intended to determine the foreseeable capital and operational needs of a multimodal transportation system.

(b) That there is an absence of an adequate forum in which local officials may exercise leadership in multimodal transportation planning and programming.

(c) Therefore, it is in the public interest to define the roles of various public entities with respect to long-range system planning and short-range capital and service planning and programming processes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130301.

The multicounty designated transportation planning agency which includes the area of the commission shall be responsible for long-range transportation system planning, including preparation of the regional transportation plan as defined in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 65080) of Title 7 of the Government Code in such area.

Such planning shall be directed to, among other things:

(a) Identification of corridors of travel.

(b) Definition of the transportation problems of each corridor.

(c) Definition of the transportation goals for each corridor.

(d) Definition of land use goals, with the concurrence of affected local jurisdictions, that should be supported by transportation investment decisions in each corridor.

(e) Recommendation of priority corridors for major resource allocations.

(f) Recommendation of the mix of alternative transportation modes appropriate for deployment in light of the transportation needs and goals for each corridor.

(g) Recommendation of environmental, economic, energy, and social policies that should guide transportation investment decision within corridors.

(h) Coordination of the plans and short-range transportation improvement programs developed by the commissions, including resolution of conflicts between such plans and programs.

(i) Determination of regional priorities and an annual regional program for the use of federal-aid urban system funds, and funds to be expended pursuant to Section 1604 of Title 49 of the United States Code, based on the priorities of projects appearing in the short-range transportation improvement program adopted by each commission.

(j) Review and comment concerning all near-term transportation improvement programs after the development of, but prior to, adoption of such programs by the commission. The review shall be conducted pursuant to Section 130059 and in such a manner so that it does not unnecessarily slow or impede the transportation planning and programming process.

(k) Development of an annual unified work program for all transportation planning activities within the jurisdiction of the multicounty designated transportation planning agency in cooperation and coordination with the Department of Transportation and the commission and in conformance with federal laws and rules and regulations. Such cooperation and coordination shall specifically apply to the determination of appropriate planning methods for projecting and planning transportation use, and its effect on land use, within the jurisdiction of the agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1172, Sec. 9.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

130302.

The role of the multicounty designated transportation planning agency, in coordinating, reviewing, and resolving intercommission conflicts, approving multicounty transportation plans, in developing plans and programs, shall be a cooperative effort with the commissions and shall be executed so as not to unnecessarily impede or slow the transportation planning and programming process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130303.

With respect to the area under its jurisdiction, the commission shall be responsible for short-range capital and service planning directed to:

(a) Determination, on an annual basis, of the total amount of funds that could be available to the commission for transportation planning and development.

(b) Development and approval of a short-range three- to five-year transportation improvement program with an annual updated element reflecting all transportation capital and service priorities within the jurisdiction of the commission to be developed with all appropriate coordination and cooperation between the commission and state and local transportation agencies and operators. All projects utilizing federal and state highway and transit funds, and all exclusive public mass transit guideway projects no matter how funded, shall be included in a transportation improvement program adopted by the commission. The program shall also be developed in coordination with the multicounty designated transportation planning agency and the Department of Transportation, shall be consistent with the adopted regional transportation plan, and shall be reviewed and commented on pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 130301.

(c) Coordination and approval of all public mass transit service within the jurisdiction of the commission and between the jurisdiction of other commissions or transit operators.

(d) Determination or approval of the location and capacity of all capital development projects, including, but not limited to, exclusive public mass transit guideway systems, state highway projects, and federal-aid highway projects.

(e) Selection and specific approval of appropriate mass transit hardware and technology to be funded by the transportation improvement program.

(f) Determination and approval of the staging and scheduling of construction and other development relative to all transportation improvement projects to be funded by the transportation improvement program.

(g) Administration of the countywide program for the expenditure of funds allocated pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 704, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

130303.1.

In addition to its short-range transportation planning responsibilities, the commission shall also be responsible, pursuant to Section 180206, for developing long-range expenditure plans for transportation programs included in voter-approved transaction and use tax measures that are consistent with the regional transportation plan and the regional transportation improvement program developed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 65080) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code and this article and Article 3 (commencing with Section 130250) and Article 10 (commencing with Section 130450).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1172, Sec. 11.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

130304.

(a) The county transportation commission shall submit the short-range transportation improvement program prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 130303 to the multicounty designated transportation planning agency. The program shall be the county transportation commission’s recommendation to the agency regarding that portion of the regional transportation improvement program with respect to short-range objectives applicable to the county under the jurisdiction of the county transportation commission. The recommended program shall be submitted to the agency in a timely fashion, and the agency shall review and adopt this portion of the regional transportation improvement program in a timely fashion, giving full explanation for any necessary revision of the county transportation commission’s recommended program.

(b) The multicounty designated transportation planning agency may revise the submitted transportation improvement program in order to resolve conflicts between the recommended programs or with the adopted regional transportation plan. In case of a disagreement as to the resolution of such a conflict between the agency and the involved county transportation commissions, the California Transportation Commission shall resolve the conflict.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------

130305.

The commission shall take all action necessary to obtain the maximum amount of funding available pursuant to Section 1602 of Title 49 of the United States Code. Public transit operators or other public agencies may only apply for such funds under such terms as prescribed by the commission. The commission may authorize the operator or the agency, as the case may be, to be responsible for the administration of its grant on the condition that the commission receives adequate and timely notice of all formal or other significant communications between the operator or agency and the federal government regarding the grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130306.

The commission shall determine the projects on the federal-aid urban system to be funded. The commission shall determine the projects to be funded pursuant to Sections 1602 and 1604 of Title 49 of the United States Code. The commission shall also determine the program to be funded by funds allocated pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Transactions and Use Taxes [130350. - 130355.]

130350.

A retail transactions and use tax ordinance applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of the County of Los Angeles may be adopted by the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, provided that two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure vote to authorize its enactment at a special election called for that purpose by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 343, Sec. 28.5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

130350.4.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In authorizing the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (MTA) to impose a transaction and use tax pursuant to Section 130350.5, the Legislature intends for the net revenues derived from the tax to be used to fund a transportation investment program that provides mobility, health, and safety benefits to the people residing in all regions of the County of Los Angeles.

(b) For purposes of proposing to the voters of the County of Los Angeles the imposition of a 0.5 percent transaction and use tax at the election held on November 4, 2008, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 130350.5, the MTA adopted, on July 24, 2008, a local ordinance that includes as “Attachment A” a plan for the expenditure of the net revenues derived from the imposition of the tax. The adoption of Attachment A constitutes the adoption of an expenditure plan pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 130350.5.

(c) In addition to the projects and funding amounts identified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of 130350.5, the adopted expenditure plan includes other high-priority projects and funding amounts for the region, including, but not limited to, the following projects:

(1) Green Line Extension to the Los Angeles International Airport– two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000).

(2) Interstate 710 North Gap Closure (tunnel) – seven hundred eighty million dollars ($780,000,000).

(3) Gold Line Eastside Extension – one billion two hundred seventy-one million dollars ($1,271,000,000).

(4) Interstate 605 Corridor “Hot Spot” Interchanges – five hundred ninety million dollars ($590,000,000).

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that all regions of the county stand to benefit from the proposed expenditure plan; therefore, the MTA shall strive to maintain the fair and equitable geographic balance in the plan and shall strive to complete those capital projects as soon as practicable, consistent with the requirements of the proposing ordinance, state and federal law.

(e) Because it is in the interest of the people of the County of Los Angeles and the people of the State of California to ensure that the net revenues derived from the tax imposed pursuant to this act are expended efficiently, and in a manner consistent with the adopted expenditure plan, the MTA shall notify the Legislature prior to the adoption of amendments to the adopted expenditure plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

130350.5.

(a) In addition to any other tax that it is authorized by law to impose, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (MTA) may impose, in compliance with subdivision (b), a transactions and use tax at a rate of 0.5 percent that is applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county.

(b) For purposes of the taxing authority set forth in subdivision (a), all of the following apply:

(1) The tax shall be proposed in a transactions and use tax ordinance, that conforms with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7261) to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7275),
 inclusive, of the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), and that is approved by a majority of the entire membership of the authority.

(2) The tax may be imposed only if the proposing ordinance is approved by two-thirds of the voters, in the manner as otherwise required by law, voting on this measure, in an election held on November 4, 2008, or at a subsequent election and, if so approved, shall become operative as provided in Section 130352.

(3) The proposing ordinance shall specify, in addition to the rate of tax and other matters as required by the Transactions and Use Tax Law, that the net revenues derived from the tax are to be administered by the MTA as provided in this section. Net revenues shall be defined as all revenues derived from the tax less any refunds, costs of administration by the
 State Board of Equalization, and costs of administration by the MTA. Such costs of administration by the MTA shall not exceed 1.5 percent of the revenues derived from the tax. The MTA shall, during the period in which the ordinance is operative, allocate 20 percent of all net revenues derived from the tax for bus operations to all eligible and included municipal transit operators in the County of Los Angeles and to the MTA, in accordance with Section 99285. However, the allocations to the MTA and eligible and included municipal operators shall be made solely from revenues derived from a tax imposed pursuant to this section, and not from local discretionary sources. Funds allocated by MTA to itself pursuant to this section shall be used for transit operations and shall not supplant funds from any other source allocated by MTA to itself for public transit operations. Funds allocated by MTA to the eligible and included municipal operators pursuant to this section shall be used for transit operations and shall
 not supplant any funds authorized by other provisions of law and allocated by MTA to the eligible and included municipal operators for public transit. In addition to this amount, the MTA shall allocate 5 percent of all net revenues derived from the tax, for rail operations. The MTA shall include the projects and programs described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) in the expenditure plan required under subdivision (f). The MTA shall include all projects and programs described in the expenditure plan required under subdivision (f) in its Long Range Transportation Plan (LRTP). The priorities for projects and programs described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) and in the expenditure plan required under subdivision (f) shall be those set forth in the expenditure plan. The funding amounts specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) are minimum amounts that shall be allocated by the MTA from the net revenues derived from a tax imposed pursuant to this section. Nothing in this section prohibits the MTA from allocating additional
 net revenues derived from the tax to these projects and programs.

(A) Capital Projects.

(i) Exposition Boulevard Light Rail Transit Project from downtown Los Angeles to Santa Monica. The sum of nine hundred twenty-five million dollars ($925,000,000).

(ii) Crenshaw Transit Corridor from Wilshire Boulevard to Los Angeles International Airport along Crenshaw Boulevard. The sum of two hundred thirty-five million five hundred thousand dollars ($235,500,000).

(iii) San Fernando Valley North-South Rapidways. The sum of one hundred million five hundred thousand dollars ($100,500,000).

(iv) Metro Gold Line (Pasadena to Claremont) Light Rail Transit Extension. The sum of seven hundred thirty-five
 million dollars ($735,000,000).

(v) Metro Regional Connector. The sum of one hundred sixty million dollars ($160,000,000).

(vi) Metro Westside Subway Extension. The sum of nine hundred million dollars ($900,000,000).

(vii) State Highway Route 5 Carmenita Road Interchange Improvement. The sum of one hundred thirty-eight million dollars ($138,000,000).

(viii) State Highway Route 5 Capacity Enhancement (State Highway Route 134 to State Highway Route 170, including access improvement for Empire Avenue). The sum of two hundred seventy-one million five hundred thousand dollars ($271,500,000).

(ix) State Highway Route 5 Capacity Enhancement (State Highway Route 605 to the Orange County line,
 including improvements to the Valley View Interchange). The sum of two hundred sixty-four million eight hundred thousand dollars ($264,800,000).

(x) State Highway Route 5/State Highway Route 14 Capacity Enhancement. The sum of ninety million eight hundred thousand dollars ($90,800,000).

(xi) Capital Project Contingency Fund. The sum of one hundred seventy-three million dollars ($173,000,000).

(B) Capital Programs.

(i) Alameda Corridor East Grade Separations. The sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000).

(ii) MTA and Municipal Regional Clean Fuel Bus Capital (Facilities and Rolling Stock). The sum of one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000).

(iii) Countywide Soundwall Construction (MTA Regional List and Monterey Park/State Highway Route 60). The sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000).

(iv) Local return for major street resurfacing, rehabilitation, and reconstruction. The sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000).

(v) Metrolink Capital Improvements. The sum of seventy million dollars ($70,000,000).

(vi) Eastside Light Rail Access. The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(c) The MTA may incur bonded indebtedness payable from the proceeds of the tax provided by this section pursuant to the bond issuance provisions of
 Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 130500) and any successor act. The MTA shall include in the expenditure plan, required under subdivision (f), the amount of net revenue specified for all projects and programs in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) as a condition of the use and expenditure of the proceeds of the tax. The MTA shall maintain the current amount of any funding for the projects and programs specified in this section that has been previously programmed or received from sources other than the proceeds of the tax, and may not reallocate money that has been previously programmed or received for those projects and programs to other projects or uses.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the tax rate authorized by this section shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit established by that section.
